Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.141

Remedies for breach of limited liability company agreement by member.

A limited liability company agreement may provide that (1) a member who fails to perform in accordance with, or to comply with the terms and conditions of, the limited liability company agreement is subject to specified remedies or specified consequences, and (2) at the time or upon the happening of events specified in the limited liability company agreement, a member is subject to specified remedies or specified consequences. Such specified remedies or specified consequences may include and take the form of any remedy or consequence set forth in RCW 25.15.196(3).

[ 2015 c 188 s 30.]